Illinois, session 104th, HB1065.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by changing Sections 4 and 5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1054)7    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and 9terms have the meanings ascribed to them in this Section:10    "Coordinator" means the staff assistant to the principal 11executive officer of a political subdivision with the duty of 12coordinating the emergency management programs of that 13political subdivision.14    "Cyber incident" means an event occurring on or conducted 15through a computer network that actually or imminently 16jeopardizes the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of 17computers, information or communications systems or networks, 18physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or 19information systems, or information resident thereon that 20affect or control infrastructure or communications networks 21utilized by the public. "Cyber incident" includes a 22vulnerability in information systems, system security 23procedures, internal controls, or implementations that could   HB1065- 2 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1be exploited by a threat source that affect or control 2infrastructure or communications networks utilized by the 3public.4    "Disaster" means an occurrence or threat of widespread or 5severe damage, injury or loss of life or property resulting 6from any natural, technological, or human cause, including but 7not limited to fire, flood, earthquake, wind, storm, hazardous 8materials spill or other water contamination requiring 9emergency action to avert danger or damage, epidemic, air 10contamination, blight, extended periods of severe and 11inclement weather, drought, infestation, critical shortages of 12essential fuels and energy, explosion, riot, hostile military 13or paramilitary action, public health emergencies, cyber 14incidents, or acts of domestic terrorism.15    "Emergency Management" means the efforts of the State and 16the political subdivisions to develop, plan, analyze, conduct, 17provide, implement and maintain programs for disaster 18mitigation, preparedness, response and recovery.19    "Emergency Services and Disaster Agency" means the agency 20by this name, by the name Emergency Management Agency, or by 21any other name that is established by ordinance within a 22political subdivision to coordinate the emergency management 23program within that political subdivision and with private 24organizations, other political subdivisions, the State and 25federal governments.26    "Emergency Operations Plan" means the written plan of the   HB1065- 3 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1State and political subdivisions describing the organization, 2mission, and functions of the government and supporting 3services for responding to and recovering from disasters and 4shall include plans that take into account the needs of those 5individuals with household pets and service animals following 6a major disaster or emergency.7    "Emergency Services" means the coordination of functions 8by the State and its political subdivision, other than 9functions for which military forces are primarily responsible, 10as may be necessary or proper to prevent, minimize, repair, 11and alleviate injury and damage resulting from any natural or 12technological causes. These functions include, without 13limitation, fire fighting services, police services, emergency 14aviation services, medical and health services, HazMat and 15technical rescue teams, rescue, engineering, warning services, 16communications, radiological, chemical and other special 17weapons defense, evacuation of persons from stricken or 18threatened areas, emergency assigned functions of plant 19protection, temporary restoration of public utility services 20and other functions related to civilian protection, together 21with all other activities necessary or incidental to 22protecting life or property.23    "Exercise" means a planned event realistically simulating 24a disaster, conducted for the purpose of evaluating the 25political subdivision's coordinated emergency management 26capabilities, including, but not limited to, testing the   HB1065- 4 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1emergency operations plan.2    "HazMat team" means a career or volunteer mobile support 3team that has been authorized by a unit of local government to 4respond to hazardous materials emergencies and that is 5primarily designed for emergency response to chemical or 6biological terrorism, radiological emergencies, hazardous 7material spills, releases, or fires, or other contamination 8events. 9    "Illinois Emergency Management Agency" means the agency 10established by this Act within the executive branch of State 11Government responsible for coordination of the overall 12emergency management program of the State and with private 13organizations, political subdivisions, and the federal 14government. Illinois Emergency Management Agency also means 15the State Emergency Response Commission responsible for the 16implementation of Title III of the Superfund Amendments and 17Reauthorization Act of 1986.18    "Mobile Support Team" means a group of individuals 19designated as a team by the Governor or Director to train prior 20to and to be dispatched, if the Governor or the Director so 21determines, to aid and reinforce the State and political 22subdivision emergency management efforts in response to a 23disaster.24    "Municipality" means any city, village, and incorporated 25town.26    "Political Subdivision" means any county, city, village,   HB1065- 5 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1or incorporated town or township if the township is in a county 2having a population of more than 2,000,000.3    "Principal Executive Officer" means chair of the county 4board, supervisor of a township if the township is in a county 5having a population of more than 2,000,000, mayor of a city or 6incorporated town, president of a village, or in their absence 7or disability, the interim successor as established under 8Section 7 of the Emergency Interim Executive Succession Act.9    "Public health emergency" means an occurrence or imminent 10threat of an illness or health condition that:11        (a) is believed to be caused by any of the following:12            (i) bioterrorism;13            (ii) the appearance of a novel or previously 14        controlled or eradicated infectious agent or 15        biological toxin;16            (iii) a natural disaster;17            (iv) a chemical attack or accidental release; or18            (v) a nuclear attack or accident; and19        (b) poses a high probability of any of the following 20    harms:21            (i) a large number of deaths in the affected 22        population;23            (ii) a large number of serious or long-term 24        disabilities in the affected population; or25            (iii) widespread exposure to an infectious or 26        toxic agent that poses a significant risk of   HB1065- 6 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1        substantial future harm to a large number of people in 2        the affected population.3    "Public library" means the governmental unit of any 4nonprofit library maintained for public use that is (i) 5established under the Illinois Local Library Act, the Public 6Library District Act of 1991, the Illinois Library System Act, 7or the Village Library Act or (ii) maintained and operated by a 8unit of local government. 9    "Statewide mutual aid organization" means an entity with 10local government members throughout the State that facilitates 11temporary assistance through its members in a particular 12public safety discipline, such as police, fire or emergency 13management, when an occurrence exceeds a member jurisdiction's 14capabilities. 15    "Technical rescue team" means a career or volunteer mobile 16support team that has been authorized by a unit of local 17government to respond to building collapse, high angle rescue, 18and other specialized rescue emergencies and that is primarily 19designated for emergency response to technical rescue events. 20(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 3305/5)22    Sec. 5. Illinois Emergency Management Agency. 23    (a) There is created within the executive branch of the 24State Government an Illinois Emergency Management Agency and a 25Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency, herein   HB1065- 7 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1called the "Director" who shall be the head thereof. The 2Director shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice 3and consent of the Senate, and shall serve for a term of 2 4years beginning on the third Monday in January of the 5odd-numbered year, and until a successor is appointed and has 6qualified; except that the term of the first Director 7appointed under this Act shall expire on the third Monday in 8January, 1989. The Director shall not hold any other 9remunerative public office. For terms beginning after January 1018, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1179) and 11before January 16, 2023, the annual salary of the Director 12shall be as provided in Section 5-300 of the Civil 13Administrative Code of Illinois. Notwithstanding any other 14provision of law, for terms beginning on or after January 16, 152023, the Director shall receive an annual salary of $180,000 16or as set by the Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 172023, and on each July 1 thereafter, the Director shall 18receive an increase in salary based on a cost of living 19adjustment as authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 2086th General Assembly. 21    For terms beginning on or after January 16, 2023, the 22Assistant Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 23shall receive an annual salary of $156,600 or as set by the 24Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 2023, and on each 25July 1 thereafter, the Assistant Director shall receive an 26increase in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as   HB1065- 8 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General 2Assembly. 3    (b) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall obtain, 4under the provisions of the Personnel Code, technical, 5clerical, stenographic and other administrative personnel, and 6may make expenditures within the appropriation therefor as may 7be necessary to carry out the purpose of this Act. The agency 8created by this Act is intended to be a successor to the agency 9created under the Illinois Emergency Services and Disaster 10Agency Act of 1975 and the personnel, equipment, records, and 11appropriations of that agency are transferred to the successor 12agency as of June 30, 1988 (the effective date of this Act).13    (c) The Director, subject to the direction and control of 14the Governor, shall be the executive head of the Illinois 15Emergency Management Agency and the State Emergency Response 16Commission and shall be responsible under the direction of the 17Governor, for carrying out the program for emergency 18management of this State. The Director shall also maintain 19liaison and cooperate with the emergency management 20organizations of this State and other states and of the 21federal government.22    (d) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall take an 23integral part in the development and revision of political 24subdivision emergency operations plans prepared under 25paragraph (f) of Section 10. To this end it shall employ or 26otherwise secure the services of professional and technical   HB1065- 9 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1personnel capable of providing expert assistance to the 2emergency services and disaster agencies. These personnel 3shall consult with emergency services and disaster agencies on 4a regular basis and shall make field examinations of the 5areas, circumstances, and conditions that particular political 6subdivision emergency operations plans are intended to apply.7    (e) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and political 8subdivisions shall be encouraged to form an emergency 9management advisory committee composed of private and public 10personnel representing the emergency management phases of 11mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. The Local 12Emergency Planning Committee, as created under the Illinois 13Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act, shall 14serve as an advisory committee to the emergency services and 15disaster agency or agencies serving within the boundaries of 16that Local Emergency Planning Committee planning district for:17        (1) the development of emergency operations plan 18    provisions for hazardous chemical emergencies; and19        (2) the assessment of emergency response capabilities 20    related to hazardous chemical emergencies.21    (f) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall:22        (1) Coordinate the overall emergency management 23    program of the State.24        (2) Cooperate with local governments, the federal 25    government, and any public or private agency or entity in 26    achieving any purpose of this Act and in implementing   HB1065- 10 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1    emergency management programs for mitigation, 2    preparedness, response, and recovery.3        (2.5) Develop a comprehensive emergency preparedness 4    and response plan for any nuclear accident in accordance 5    with Section 65 of the Nuclear Safety Law of 2004 and in 6    development of the Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness 7    program in accordance with Section 8 of the Illinois 8    Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act.9        (2.6) Coordinate with the Department of Public Health 10    with respect to planning for and responding to public 11    health emergencies.12        (3) Prepare, for issuance by the Governor, executive 13    orders, proclamations, and regulations as necessary or 14    appropriate in coping with disasters.15        (4) Promulgate rules and requirements for political 16    subdivision emergency operations plans that are not 17    inconsistent with and are at least as stringent as 18    applicable federal laws and regulations.19        (5) Review and approve, in accordance with Illinois 20    Emergency Management Agency rules, emergency operations 21    plans for those political subdivisions required to have an 22    emergency services and disaster agency pursuant to this 23    Act.24        (5.5) Promulgate rules and requirements for the 25    political subdivision emergency management exercises, 26    including, but not limited to, exercises of the emergency   HB1065- 11 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1    operations plans.2        (5.10) Review, evaluate, and approve, in accordance 3    with Illinois Emergency Management Agency rules, political 4    subdivision emergency management exercises for those 5    political subdivisions required to have an emergency 6    services and disaster agency pursuant to this Act.7        (6) Determine requirements of the State and its 8    political subdivisions for food, clothing, and other 9    necessities in event of a disaster.10        (7) Establish a register of persons with types of 11    emergency management training and skills in mitigation, 12    preparedness, response, and recovery. 13        (8) Establish a register of government and private 14    response resources available for use in a disaster.15        (9) Expand the Earthquake Awareness Program and its 16    efforts to distribute earthquake preparedness materials to 17    schools, political subdivisions, community groups, civic 18    organizations, and the media. Emphasis will be placed on 19    those areas of the State most at risk from an earthquake. 20    Maintain the list of all school districts, hospitals, 21    airports, power plants, including nuclear power plants, 22    lakes, dams, emergency response facilities of all types, 23    and all other major public or private structures which are 24    at the greatest risk of damage from earthquakes under 25    circumstances where the damage would cause subsequent harm 26    to the surrounding communities and residents.  HB1065- 12 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1        (10) Disseminate all information, completely and 2    without delay, on water levels for rivers and streams and 3    any other data pertaining to potential flooding supplied 4    by the Division of Water Resources within the Department 5    of Natural Resources to all political subdivisions to the 6    maximum extent possible.7        (11) Develop agreements, if feasible, with medical 8    supply and equipment firms to supply resources as are 9    necessary to respond to an earthquake or any other 10    disaster as defined in this Act. These resources will be 11    made available upon notifying the vendor of the disaster. 12    Payment for the resources will be in accordance with 13    Section 7 of this Act. The Illinois Department of Public 14    Health shall determine which resources will be required 15    and requested.16        (11.5) In coordination with the Illinois State Police, 17    develop and implement a community outreach program to 18    promote awareness among the State's parents and children 19    of child abduction prevention and response.20        (12) Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, 21    award capital and non-capital grants to Illinois hospitals 22    or health care facilities located outside of a city with a 23    population in excess of 1,000,000 to be used for purposes 24    that include, but are not limited to, preparing to respond 25    to mass casualties and disasters, maintaining and 26    improving patient safety and quality of care, and   HB1065- 13 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1    protecting the confidentiality of patient information. No 2    single grant for a capital expenditure shall exceed 3    $300,000. No single grant for a non-capital expenditure 4    shall exceed $100,000. In awarding such grants, preference 5    shall be given to hospitals that serve a significant 6    number of Medicaid recipients, but do not qualify for 7    disproportionate share hospital adjustment payments under 8    the Illinois Public Aid Code. To receive such a grant, a 9    hospital or health care facility must provide funding of 10    at least 50% of the cost of the project for which the grant 11    is being requested. In awarding such grants the Illinois 12    Emergency Management Agency shall consider the 13    recommendations of the Illinois Hospital Association.14        (13) Do all other things necessary, incidental or 15    appropriate for the implementation of this Act.16    (g) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is authorized 17to make grants to various higher education institutions, 18public K-12 school districts, area vocational centers as 19designated by the State Board of Education, inter-district 20special education cooperatives, regional safe schools, and 21nonpublic K-12 schools for safety and security improvements. 22For the purpose of this subsection (g), "higher education 23institution" means a public university, a public community 24college, or an independent, not-for-profit or for-profit 25higher education institution located in this State. Grants 26made under this subsection (g) shall be paid out of moneys   HB1065- 14 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1appropriated for that purpose from the Build Illinois Bond 2Fund. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall adopt 3rules to implement this subsection (g). These rules may 4specify: (i) the manner of applying for grants; (ii) project 5eligibility requirements; (iii) restrictions on the use of 6grant moneys; (iv) the manner in which the various higher 7education institutions must account for the use of grant 8moneys; and (v) any other provision that the Illinois 9Emergency Management Agency determines to be necessary or 10useful for the administration of this subsection (g).11    (g-5) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is 12authorized to make grants to public libraries and 13not-for-profit organizations which are exempt from federal 14income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Federal 15Internal Revenue Code for eligible security improvements that 16assist the organization in preventing, preparing for, or 17responding to threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism. To be 18eligible for a grant under the program, the Agency must 19determine that the organization is at a high risk of being 20subject to threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism based on the 21organization's profile, ideology, mission, or beliefs. 22Eligible security improvements shall include all eligible 23preparedness activities under the federal Nonprofit Security 24Grant Program, including, but not limited to, physical 25security upgrades, security training exercises, preparedness 26training exercises, contracting with security personnel, and   HB1065- 15 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1any other security upgrades deemed eligible by the Director. 2Eligible security improvements shall not duplicate, in part or 3in whole, a project included under any awarded federal grant 4or in a pending federal application. The Director shall 5establish procedures and forms by which applicants may apply 6for a grant and procedures for distributing grants to 7recipients. Any security improvements awarded shall remain at 8the physical property listed in the grant application, unless 9authorized by Agency rule or approved by the Agency in 10writing. The procedures shall require each applicant to do the 11following:12        (1) identify and substantiate prior or current 13    threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism against the 14    not-for-profit organization;15        (2) indicate the symbolic or strategic value of one or 16    more sites that renders the site a possible target of a 17    threat, attack, or act of terrorism;18        (3) discuss potential consequences to the organization 19    if the site is damaged, destroyed, or disrupted by a 20    threat, attack, or act of terrorism;21        (4) describe how the grant will be used to integrate 22    organizational preparedness with broader State and local 23    preparedness efforts, as described by the Agency in each 24    Notice of Opportunity for Funding;25        (5) submit (i) a vulnerability assessment conducted by 26    experienced security, law enforcement, or military   HB1065- 16 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1    personnel, or conducted using an Agency-approved or 2    federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program self-assessment 3    tool, and (ii) a description of how the grant award will be 4    used to address the vulnerabilities identified in the 5    assessment; and6        (6) submit any other relevant information as may be 7    required by the Director.8    The Agency is authorized to use funds appropriated for the 9grant program described in this subsection (g-5) to administer 10the program. Any Agency Notice of Opportunity for Funding, 11proposed or final rulemaking, guidance, training opportunity, 12or other resource related to the grant program must be 13published on the Agency's publicly available website, and any 14announcements related to funding shall be shared with all 15State legislative offices, the Governor's office, emergency 16services and disaster agencies mandated or required pursuant 17to subsections (b) through (d) of Section 10, and any other 18State agencies as determined by the Agency. Subject to 19appropriation, the grant application period shall be open for 20no less than 45 calendar days during the first application 21cycle each fiscal year, unless the Agency determines that a 22shorter period is necessary to avoid conflicts with the annual 23federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program funding cycle. 24Additional application cycles may be conducted during the same 25fiscal year, subject to availability of funds. Upon request, 26Agency staff shall provide reasonable assistance to any   HB1065- 17 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1applicant in completing a grant application or meeting a 2post-award requirement. 3    In addition to any advance payment rules or procedures 4adopted by the Agency, the Agency shall adopt rules or 5procedures by which grantees under this subsection (g-5) may 6receive a working capital advance of initial start-up costs 7and up to 2 months of program expenses, not to exceed 25% of 8the total award amount, if, during the application process, 9the grantee demonstrates a need for funds to commence a 10project. The remaining funds must be paid through 11reimbursement after the grantee presents sufficient supporting 12documentation of expenditures for eligible activities. 13    (h) Except as provided in Section 17.5 of this Act, any 14moneys received by the Agency from donations or sponsorships 15unrelated to a disaster shall be deposited in the Emergency 16Planning and Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 17appropriation, to effectuate planning and training activities. 18Any moneys received by the Agency from donations during a 19disaster and intended for disaster response or recovery shall 20be deposited into the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund and 21used for disaster response and recovery pursuant to the 22Disaster Relief Act. 23    (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency may by rule 24assess and collect reasonable fees for attendance at 25Agency-sponsored conferences to enable the Agency to carry out 26the requirements of this Act. Any moneys received under this   HB1065- 18 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1subsection shall be deposited in the Emergency Planning and 2Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 3appropriation, for planning and training activities.4    (j) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is authorized 5to make grants to other State agencies, public universities, 6units of local government, and statewide mutual aid 7organizations to enhance statewide emergency preparedness and 8response. 9    (k) Subject to appropriation from the Emergency Planning 10and Training Fund, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 11and Office of Homeland Security shall obtain training services 12and support for local emergency services and support for local 13emergency services and disaster agencies for training, 14exercises, and equipment related to carbon dioxide pipelines 15and sequestration, and, subject to the availability of 16funding, shall provide $5,000 per year to the Illinois Fire 17Service Institute for first responder training required under 18Section 4-615 of the Public Utilities Act. Amounts in the 19Emergency Planning and Training Fund will be used by the 20Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 21Security for administrative costs incurred in carrying out the 22requirements of this subsection. To carry out the purposes of 23this subsection, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 24Office of Homeland Security may accept moneys from all 25authorized sources into the Emergency Planning and Training 26Fund, including, but not limited to, transfers from the Carbon   HB1065- 19 -LRB104 03496 BDA 13519 b1Dioxide Sequestration Administrative Fund and the Public 2Utility Fund. 3    (l) (k) The Agency shall do all other things necessary, 4incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this Act, 5including the adoption of rules in accordance with the 6Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 7(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-418, eff. 91-1-24; 103-588, eff. 1-1-25; 103-651, eff. 7-18-24; 103-999, 10eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)